Hawaii statutes.
[§241-4.3] Alternative tax.
Section 1201 (with respect to alternative tax for corporations) of the Internal
Revenue Code shall be operative for the purposes of this chapter and shall be
applied as set forth in this section. If for any taxable year a bank, building
and loan association, development company, financial corporation, financial
services loan company, small business investment company, mortgage loan
company, financial holding company, or trust company has a net capital gain,
then, in lieu of the tax imposed by section 241-4, there is hereby imposed a
tax (if such tax is less than the tax imposed under section 241-4) which shall
consist of the sum of:

(1) A tax computed on the taxable income reduced by
the amount of the net capital gain, at the rates and in the manner as if this
section had not been enacted; plus

(2) Four per cent of the net capital gain for the
taxable year. [L 1992, c 106, §9]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next